Utah statutes.
10-7-6.   Contracts for lighting public buildings, streets, and alleys.

The board of commissioners, city council, or the board of trustees may enter into a contract on behalf of the city or town for the lighting of its public buildings, streets, alleys, and other public places for a period of time that the board of commissioners, city council, or board of trustees may consider advisable.



Amended by Chapter 105, 2012 General Session

